Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.185

Coyote getters.

The use of "coyote getters" or similar spring-triggered shell devices shall not constitute a violation of any of the laws of the state of Washington when the use of such "coyote getters" is authorized by the state department of agriculture and/or the state department of fish and wildlife in cooperative programs with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, for the purpose of controlling or eliminating coyotes harmful to livestock and game animals on range land or forest areas.

[ 1999 c 143 s 3; 1988 c 36 s 3; 1965 c 46 s 1.]